District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.02

Asbestos worker license.

(a)

To obtain a license as an asbestos worker, a person shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that the applicant has:

(1)

Successfully completed a course of instruction on asbestos abatement that has been approved by the Board;

(2)

Provided such additional evidence as the Board or the federal government has determined is necessary for the occupation of asbestos workers; and

(3)

Complied with other standards required for licensure by the Non-Health Related Professions and Occupations Licensure Act of 1998.

(b)

An asbestos worker license shall expire 2 years from the date of issuance. A license may be renewed for additional 2-year periods if the asbestos worker submits a renewal application with the renewal fee to the Mayor.

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 3, 37 DCR 1641
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1240, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 6-991.2.
“The Non-Health Related Professions and Occupations Licensure Act of 1998,” referenced in (a)(3), is title I of D.C. Law 12-261.